Massachusetts, session 194th, H300.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (b) of section 2 of chapter 23G of the General Laws, as
amended by section 126 of chapter 7 of the acts of 2023, is hereby amended by striking the
figure “9” and inserting in place thereof the figure “12”.
SECTION 2. Subsection (b) of section 2 of chapter 23 of the General Laws, as amended
by section 126 of chapter 7 of the acts of 2023, is hereby amended by inserting after the word
“financing” the following:-
, 1 of whom shall be experienced in supporting the growth of businesses owned by
individuals from diverse communities, 1 of whom shall be the owner of a microbusiness, 1 of
whom shall be the owner of a small business

of 1